Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 349 Coalbed Methane Development
349.080.
Authority of Coalbed Methane Well Review Board to issue pooling orders.

Whenever an applicant proposes to drill, deepen, convert, or reopen a well for purposes of production of coalbed methane and the ownership of the right to produce coalbed methane is in dispute, the department shall refer the application to the review board for its consideration and the issuance of appropriate pooling orders, if any, in accordance with KRS

349.085

. Upon the issuance of a pooling order by the review board, and if all other provisions of this chapter are complied with, the department shall issue a permit to drill, deepen, convert, or reopen the well and require the development and operation of all pooled tracts and interests as a single leasehold estate in accordance with the pooling order.

No pooling as permitted by this section shall be ordered except:

When an application has been filed to drill, deepen, or reopen a well within the distance limitations prescribed in KRS

349.075

; or

A request for pooling has been made pursuant to this section or KRS

349.085

.

No pooling, as permitted by this section, shall be ordered with respect to any tract or portion thereof upon which a well is drilled, deepened, or converted or reopened:

Unless the pooling was requested prior to the commencement of the drilling, deepening, converting, or reopening of the coalbed methane well; and

Unless the request, if made by the owner of an operating interest who elects to participate in the risk and cost of the drilling, deepening, converting, or reopening of the coalbed methane well, is accompanied by a bond or other security satisfactory to and in an amount set by the review board for the payment of such owner’s share of the cost of drilling, deepening, converting, or reopening the well.

Production from any well which is ordered pooled pursuant to this section shall be deemed for all purposes to have been so produced from each tract or portion thereof included in the pool in proportion to the amounts established in the pooling order.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 16, effective July 13, 2004.

349.085.
Duties of person requesting pooling order — Notice to interested persons — Review board to rule on request for pooling order — Contents of pooling order — Rights and financial shares of interested parties — Escrow account.

The person requesting a pooling order shall provide to the department a list of all persons reasonably known to own an oil or gas interest and all coal interest holders, in any tract upon which the coalbed methane well will be located from the surface to a depth of one hundred (100) feet below the base of the deepest coal seam to be penetrated. A pooling order shall be made only after the department provides notice to all persons reasonably known to own an oil or gas interest and all coal interest holders in any tract upon which the well will be located and any tract or portion thereof proposed to be pooled in any drilling unit, from the surface to a depth of one hundred (100) feet below the base of the deepest coal seam to be penetrated, after a hearing has been held. After filing an application for a pooling order under KRS 349.080(1), where unknown or nonlocatable owners exist, or at the request of the permit applicant or person requesting a pooling order, the permit applicant shall publish, at least twenty (20) days prior to the hearing on the application for the pooling order, one (1) notice in the newspaper of the largest circulation in each county in which any tract, or portion thereof, proposed to be pooled is located. The notice shall:

State that an application for a pooling order is being filed with the review board;

Describe any tract, or portion thereof, proposed to be pooled;

In the case of an unknown owner, identify the name of the last known owner;

In the case of a nonlocatable owner, identify the owner and the owner’s last known address; and

State that any party claiming an interest in any tract, or portion thereof, proposed to be pooled should contact the permit applicant at the published address and provide a copy of the notification to the review board within twenty (20) days of the date of the publication.

The review board shall grant or deny the request for a pooling order and issue an order consistent with the intent and purposes of KRS Chapters 350 and 352 and this chapter, taking into consideration the following factors that it considers applicable in the particular proceeding:

The area which may be drained efficiently and economically by the proposed coalbed methane well or wells and the spacing requirements of KRS

349.075

;

The plan of development of the coal and the need for proper ventilation of any mines or degasification of any affected coal seams;

The nature and character of any coal seam or seams which will be affected by the proposed coalbed methane well or wells;

The surface topography and mineral boundaries of the lands underlaid by the coal seams to be included in the unit;

Evidence relevant to the proper boundary of the drilling unit;

The nature and extent of ownership of each coalbed methane owner or claimant and whether conflicting claims exist;

Whether the applicant for the drilling unit proposes to be the operator of the coalbed methane well or wells within the drilling unit; and if so, whether the applicant has a lease or other agreement from the owners or claimants of a majority interest in the proposed drilling unit;

Whether a disagreement exists among the coalbed methane owners or claimants over the designation of the operator for any coalbed methane wells within the unit, and if so, relevant evidence to determine which operator can properly and efficiently develop the coalbed methane within the unit for the benefit of the majority of the coalbed methane owners;

If more than one person is interested in operating a coalbed methane well within the unit, the estimated cost submitted by each such person for drilling, completing, operating, and marketing the coalbed methane from any proposed coalbed methane well or wells;

Any other available geological or scientific data pertaining to the pool which is proposed to be developed;

The correlative rights of the operators and owners of the coalbed methane, so that each operator and owner may obtain his or her just and equitable share of production from the coalbed methane; and

Any other factor the review board determines should be considered consistent with KRS Chapters 350 and 352 and this chapter.

Upon consideration of the matters raised at the hearing, the review board shall render a decision based upon whether to grant a pooling order, and shall enter a written order containing findings of fact and conclusions which address any relevant considerations in subsection (2) of this section and based thereon shall issue and file with the department a written order granting the pooling order with any applicable conditions or denying the pooling order.

A pooling order shall authorize the drilling, deepening, or reopening, and the operation of a well for the production of coalbed methane on the tracts or portions thereof pooled; shall designate the operator to drill and operate the well; shall prescribe the time and manner in which all owners of working interests in the pooled tracts or portions thereof may elect to participate therein; shall provide that all reasonable costs and expenses of drilling, deepening, converting or reopening, and the completing, operating, plugging, and abandoning the well shall be borne, and all production from the well shall be shared, by all owners of working interests in proportion to the net mineral acres in the pooled tracts owned or under lease to each owner; and shall make provision for the payment of the reasonable and actual cost thereof, including a reasonable charge for supervision, by all those who elect to participate therein.

A pooling order shall establish a procedure for the owner who claims a working interest and who does not decide to become a participating working interest owner to elect to either:

Surrender, by means of sale or lease, the interest to a participating working interest owner on a reasonable basis and for a reasonable consideration, which if not agreed upon shall be one-eighth (1/8) of the production attributable to the well; or

Share in the operation of the well as a nonparticipating working interest owner on a carried basis after the proceeds allocable to his or her share equal to two hundred percent (200%) of the share of the costs allocable to his or her interest.

A coalbed methane owner or claimant whose identity and location remain unknown at the conclusion of the hearing concerning the entry of a pooling order for which public notice was given and whose interest is pooled pursuant to KRS 349.080(1) shall be deemed to have elected to lease the interest to the coalbed methane operator, exclusive of one-eighth (1/8) of the production attributable to the unleased interest, and shall not be entitled to make the election established in subsection (5) of this section.

Except as provided in this section, a coalbed methane owner who does not make an election under the pooling order within thirty (30) days of the entry of the order shall be deemed to have leased the coalbed methane interest to the coalbed methane well operator in the manner established in subsection (6) of this section.

A person whose interest is subject to a coalbed methane lease or other agreement which grants to another the right to operate or conduct operations shall not own an operating interest for the purposes of this section.

A certified copy of any pooling order entered under this section shall be entitled to be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county or counties in which all or any portion of the pooled tract is located, and the record of the order, from the time of lodging the order for record, shall be notice of the order to all persons.

Each pooling order for a coalbed methane well issued pursuant to KRS 349.080(1) shall provide for the establishment of an interest-bearing escrow account to be maintained by the department. The escrow account shall receive deposits and hold payment for costs and proceeds attributable to the conflicting interests as follows:

Each participating working interest owner, except for the unit operator, shall deposit in the escrow account the owner’s proportionate share of the costs allocable to the ownership interest claimed by each participating working interest owner as set forth in the pooling order; and

The unit operator shall collect all proceeds from the sale or use of coalbed methane and deposit in the escrow account all proceeds attributable to the conflicting interests of lessors, lessees, or royalty owners and all proceeds in excess of the recovery of all capital costs and expenses and all ongoing operational expenses including reasonable overhead costs and operating fees attributable to conflicting working interests.

The department shall order payment of principal and accrued interest from the escrow account to all legally entitled entities within thirty (30) days of receipt by the department of notification of the final legal determination of entitlement or upon agreement of all entities claiming an ownership interest in the coalbed methane. Upon the department’s final determination:

Each legally entitled participating working interest owner shall receive a proportionate share of the proceeds attributable to the conflicting ownership interest;

Each legally entitled nonparticipating working interest owner shall receive a proportionate share of the proceeds attributable to the conflicting ownership interest, less the cost of being carried as a nonparticipating working interest owner as determined by the election of the person under the applicable pooling order;

Each person leasing or deemed to have leased its coalbed methane ownership interest to the unit operator shall receive a share of the royalty proceeds as set out in the applicable pooling order attributable to the conflicting interests of the lessees;

The unit operator shall receive the costs contributed to the escrow account by each legally entitled participating working interest owner, but only to the extent that the costs and expenses described in subsection (10)(b) of this section have not been recouped from production proceeds;

Each participating working interest owner who is determined not to hold an ownership interest shall receive a refund of all amounts placed in escrow pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section plus interest earned thereon; and

All amounts remaining in escrow, after distribution of amounts described in paragraphs (a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this subsection, shall be distributed to the legally entitled participating working interest owners in proportion to their interests.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 17, effective July 13, 2004.

349.090.
Civil actions to review orders issued by Coalbed Methane Well Review Board — Procedure — Jurisdiction of Circuit Court.

Any person aggrieved by any order issued by the review board under this chapter shall have the right to bring a civil action for review of the order by filing a complaint in the Circuit Court of the county in which the premises or any portion thereof is located as established by the order, or in Franklin Circuit Court.

The civil action shall be brought within thirty (30) days after the order is issued, and in the event no civil action is filed within the thirty (30) day period, the order shall be final.

In any civil action the burden of proof shall be upon the party challenging the order. The order shall be deemed prima facie valid. Any party to the civil action may offer evidence for any part of the record of the hearing which resulted in the order, and any other relevant evidence.

In any civil action no new evidence may be introduced, except as to fraud or misconduct of some person engaged in the hearing before the review board. New evidence may be introduced if, upon motion and for good cause shown, the court determines that the interest of justice will be better served by the introduction of new evidence. The court, sitting without a jury, shall hear the cause upon the record before it. The court shall dispose of the civil action in a summary manner, being limited to determining whether or not: the review board acted without or in excess of its powers; the order was procured by fraud; the order is not in conformity with the provisions of this chapter; the order is clearly erroneous on the basis of reliable, probative, and material evidence contained in the whole record; the order is arbitrary, capricious, characterized by abuse of discretion, or clearly unwarranted exercise of discretion. The court shall enter its findings in the order book as a judgment of the court, and the judgment shall have the effect and be enforceable the same as any other judgment of the court in civil cases.

The practice, pleading, and proceedings in the civil action shall be in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure.

During the pendency of the civil action, the court may stay the order until it shall enter its decree. The court shall have jurisdiction to enter a decree affirming or setting aside the order, or remand the cause with directions to modify the order to conform to the provisions of this chapter. Appeals may be taken by any party to the suit in the same manner and to the same extent as in other civil actions.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 18, effective July 13, 2004.

349.095.
Procedure and requirements for drilling coalbed methane well.

A coalbed methane well penetrating one (1) or more workable coalbeds shall be drilled in a manner that will exclude, if practicable, all coalbed methane or coalbed methane pressure from the workable coalbed, except as is found in the workable coalbed itself. Each string of casing that is run through a workable coalbed shall be seated at least thirty (30) feet below the workable coalbed in twenty (20) feet of cement, mud, clay, or other nonporous material that will make an effective seal. If a second workable coalbed is found less than thirty (30) feet below the first workable coalbed, the casing shall be seated and mudded off as above provided at least thirty (30) feet below the second workable coalbed. If gas is found between the two (2) workable coalbeds, it shall be treated as prescribed by this chapter. After any such string of casing has been properly seated, drilling may proceed immediately.

When a coalbed methane well is drilled through the horizon of a workable coalbed where the coal has been removed, the hole shall be drilled at least thirty (30) feet below the workable coalbed, and shall be of a size sufficient to permit the placing of a liner, which shall start not less than twenty (20) feet beneath the horizon of the workable coalbed and extend not less than twenty (20) feet above it. The largest sized casing to be used in the well shall be centrally placed within this liner. The liner may be welded to the casing to be used, and the space between the liner and the casing shall be filled with cement as the liner and casing are lowered into the hole. Cement shall be placed in the bottom of the hole to a depth of twenty (20) feet to form a sealed seat for both liner and casing. Following the setting of the liner, drilling may proceed. If it is necessary to drill through the horizon of two (2) or more workable coalbeds where the coal has been removed, the liner shall be started not less than twenty (20) feet below the lowest horizon penetrated and shall extend to a point not less than twenty (20) feet above the highest horizon penetrated.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 19, effective July 13, 2004.

349.100.
Preservation of strings of casing in producing wells.

If any coalbed methane well produces coalbed methane, all coal-protecting strings of casing shall remain in place during the life of the well. The top ends of all the strings shall be provided with casing heads or other suitable devices that will allow the free passage of coalbed methane and prevent filling the annular spaces outside the casing with dirt or debris.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 20, effective July 13, 2004.

349.105.
Procedure for plugging well — Rights and duties of various parties — Restoration of surface.

No person shall abandon or remove casings from any coalbed methane well, either dry or producing, without first plugging the well in a secure manner approved by the department and consistent with administrative regulations. Upon the department’s plugging of an abandoned coalbed methane well in accordance with the requirements of this subsection, the department may sell all equipment removed from that well by sealed bid, or may include the equipment as part of compensation in the contract for the plugging of the well. Proceeds from the sale shall be deposited into the coalbed methane well plugging fund, established in KRS 349.120(3).

Not less than thirty (30) days before advertising for bids for the plugging of coalbed methane wells, the department shall publish, in a newspaper of general circulation, and in locally published newspapers serving the areas in which the wells proposed for plugging are located, notices of all wells on which there is salvageable equipment, described as to farm name, Carter Coordinate, and state plane coordinate location, for which the department intends to seek bids for plugging. If a person other than the operator claims an interest in the equipment of a well proposed for plugging, the person shall provide documentation of that interest to the department within thirty (30) days of the date of publication of the notice of the department’s intent to plug a well. Prior to the department’s advertising of bids for the plugging of a well, the department shall release the well’s equipment to the person deemed to have an interest in that equipment. It shall be the duty of the interest holder to remove the equipment before the well is plugged. If documentation as to an asserted interest is not provided to the department in the manner described in this subsection or if a person deemed to be an interest holder fails to remove the equipment before a well is plugged, the department may sell or otherwise dispose of the equipment in accordance with this section.

If a person fails to comply with subsection (1) of this section, any person lawfully in possession of land adjacent to the coalbed methane well or the department may enter on the land upon which the well is located and plug the well in the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section, and may maintain a civil action against the owner or person abandoning the well, jointly or severally, to recover the cost of plugging the well. This subsection shall not apply to persons owning the land on which the well is situated, and drilled by other persons.

In conjunction with the plugging and abandonment of any coalbed methane well or the reworking of any coalbed methane well, the operator shall restore the surface and any improvements thereon to a condition as near as practicable to their condition prior to commencement of work. The surface owner and operator may waive this requirement in writing, subject to the approval of the department that the waiver is in accordance with its administrative regulations.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 21, effective July 13, 2004.

349.110.
Department of Natural Resources to supervise drilling, casing, plugging, and filling of coalbed methane wells — Department to hold hearings and issue orders.

The department shall exercise supervision over the drilling, casing, plugging, and filling of all coalbed methane wells. The department shall exercise supervision over all mining operations in close proximity to any well. The department shall have access to the records and properties of coal, oil, gas and coalbed methane operators when necessary.

The department may receive, or may file on its own motion, formal complaints that drilling or mining operations are being conducted contrary to the provisions of this chapter or to the order of the department or review board, and shall hold administrative hearings on the complaints, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. Following a hearing, the department shall issue a final order necessary to secure the proper administration of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 22, effective July 13, 2004.

349.115.
Department of Natural Resources to adopt rules and administrative regulations after notice and hearing — Operators to submit production information annually.

The department is hereby authorized to adopt all rules, administrative regulations, and amendments to implement the provisions of this chapter. All rules, administrative regulations, and amendments promulgated under this chapter shall be promulgated by the department after notice and a hearing. At all hearings held to consider any rules, administrative regulations, or amendments thereto, any interested person shall be entitled to be heard.

All hearings shall be held at a time and place as is specified by the department according to rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter. A written record of each hearing shall be kept; however, if not at variance with KRS

61.870

to

61.884

, the keeping of a record may be waived by all parties who participate therein. All interested persons shall be entitled to be heard at all hearings conducted under this chapter.

Operators shall submit annual production information for each coalbed methane well on a form prescribed by the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 23, effective July 13, 2004.

349.120.
Well operators to execute bonds or blanket bonds in favor of department — Establishment of coalbed methane well plugging fund — Operators’ civil and criminal liability.

When any person submits to the department an application for a permit to drill a coalbed methane well, or to reopen, deepen, or temporarily abandon any coalbed methane well which is not covered by a surety bond, the department shall, except as provided in this section, require from the well operator a bond in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000). The bonds shall be made in favor of the Department for Natural Resources, conditioned that the wells upon abandonment shall be plugged in accordance with the administrative regulations and that all records required by the department be filed as specified. All bonds shall remain in effect until the plugging of the well is approved by the department, or the bond is released by the department. Any well operator in lieu of the bond may file with the department a blanket bond in a sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), covering all coalbed methane wells drilled or to be drilled in the Commonwealth by the principal in the bond, and the acceptance and approval by the department of the blanket bond shall be in full compliance with the above provision requiring an individual well bond. The department may establish a bond in a sum greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for an individual well or blanket bond in sum greater than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) if the department determines that the particular circumstances of the drilling of the well or wells warrant an increase in the bond amount. A deposit in cash or a bank-issued irrevocable letter of credit may serve in lieu of either of the individual well or blanket bonds. A certificate of deposit, the principal of which is pledged in lieu of a bond and whose interest is payable to the party making the pledge, may also be accepted by the department. If an operator is required to post individual well bonds exceeding a total of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or elects to post a blanket bond, the certificate of deposit shall be accepted by the department in lieu of that portion of the amount of the bonds exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000). The bond or bonds referred to in this section shall be executed by the well operator as principal and, if a surety bond, by a corporate surety authorized to do business in the Commonwealth. A deposit in cash shall serve in lieu of either of the above bonds; all cash bonds accepted by the department shall be deposited into an interest-bearing account, with the interest thereon payable to the special agency account known as the coalbed methane well plugging fund, created in subsection (3) of this section, to be used in accordance with the purposes described therein.

A successor to the well operator shall post bond, pay a twenty-five dollar ($25) fee per well to the department, and notify the department in writing in advance of commencing use or operations of a well or wells. The successor shall assume the obligations of this chapter as to a particular well or wells and relieve the original permittee of responsibility under this chapter with respect to the well or wells. It shall be the responsibility of the selling operator to require the successor operator to post bond before use or operation is commenced by the successor and relief of responsibility under this chapter is granted to the original permittee.

All sums received through the forfeiture of bonds shall be placed in the State Treasury and credited to a special agency account to be designated as the coalbed methane well plugging fund, which shall be in an interest-bearing account with the interest thereon payable to the fund. This fund shall be available to the department and shall be expended for the plugging of any abandoned coalbed methane wells coming within the authority of the department pursuant to this chapter. The plugging of any coalbed methane wells pursuant to this subsection shall not be construed to relieve the operator or any other person from civil or criminal liability which would exist except for the plugging. Any unencumbered and any unexpended balance of this fund remaining at the end of any fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward for the purpose of the fund until expended or until appropriated by subsequent legislative action.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 24, effective July 13, 2004.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

349.125.
Permittee to file information for transmittal to the Kentucky Geological Survey — Samples of cuttings — Confidentiality of information — Exception.

Any person to whom a permit is issued pursuant to this chapter shall file, within ninety (90) days after termination of operations conducted under the permit, with the department for transmittal to the Kentucky Geological Survey on forms to be furnished by the department the following information relating to the well:

A copy of the driller’s log certified to be true and accurate;

The depth and thickness of all water zones encountered and logged;

The depth of all showing of oil, gas, or coalbed methane;

The depth and thickness of all coal seams encountered; and

A true copy of all electrical surveys and similar logs and surveys taken. If the person to whom the permit is issued obtains a copy of the electrical survey or similar log or survey in electronic form, the operator shall submit the electrical survey or similar log in electronic form if requested by the department.

Upon request by the department, any person to whom a permit is issued shall save for the Kentucky Geological Survey samples of all cuttings from the well drilled or deepened pursuant to the permit for a period of ninety (90) days after completion thereof.

Upon request by any person furnishing information under this section, the information shall be kept confidential, for a period of one (1) year after the information is furnished by such person.

This section shall not apply to wells drilled or deepened as geological or structure test holes.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 25, effective July 13, 2004.

349.130.
Compliance with KRS 353.5901 and 353.595 — Applicants to submit operations and reclamation proposal at time of filing of application.

In all cases in which there has been a complete severance of the ownership of the coalbed methane from the ownership of the surface to be disturbed, the applicant for a coalbed methane well permit shall comply with all of the substantive requirements of KRS

353.5901

and

353.595

.

In all cases other than a complete severance of the ownership of coalbed methane from the ownership of the surface to be disturbed, the applicant for a coalbed methane well shall submit to the department an operations and reclamation proposal at the time of filing an application for a permit to drill, deepen, or reopen a coalbed methane well. The proposal shall be filed on forms provided by the department and shall include:

A proposal to prevent erosion of and sedimentation from the well site and all disturbed areas, including roads;

A narrative description of the location of all areas to be disturbed, including the location of roads, gathering lines, the well site, tanks, and other storage facilities, and any other information that may be required by the department. Accompanying this narrative description shall be a plat depicting the location on the land of all of these disturbances or facilities; and

Any additional information that the department may require.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 26, effective July 13, 2004.

349.135.
Expiration of coalbed methane well permit — Extension of permit term.

Each coalbed methane well permit issued under this chapter shall expire one (1) year after the date issued, unless the drilling, deepening, or reopening of a coalbed methane well is commenced prior to the expiration of the one (1) year period. However, the permit term shall be extended by one (1) year if, prior to the expiration date, the permit applicant:

Notifies the department in writing of the applicant’s request for an extension;

Notifies all coal interest holders originally entitled to receive a copy of the plat under KRS

349.015

;

Submits an affidavit, or verified statement, stating that the information in the original permit application is still correct; and

Submits a fee for the extension in an amount equal to the permit fee required by KRS

349.040

.

The extension of the permit term pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall not create a right to object to the coalbed methane well location under KRS

349.020

nor to mediation under KRS

353.5901

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 27, effective July 13, 2004.

349.140.
Establishment of affirmative defense for willful trespass arising from coalbed methane drilling operations.

In any case where title to subsurface minerals has been severed in such a way that title to natural gas underlying the tract and title to coal underlying the tract are in different persons, it shall be an affirmative defense to any action for willful trespass arising from the drilling, development, operation, and production of coalbed methane from any coal seam or gob area underlying the tract, that the operator of the coalbed methane well permitted, drilled, completed, and produced the coalbed methane well under color of title of any instrument, deed, or lease for oil and gas purposes from the gas owner, or any instrument, deed, or lease for coal mining purposes from the coal owner.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 28, effective July 13, 2004.

349.145.
Authorization for Department of Natural Resources and Attorney General to bring suit in Circuit Court to restrain violations under this chapter.

Whenever it appears that a person is violating or threatening to violate any provision of this chapter, or any rule, administrative regulation, or order promulgated or issued under this chapter, the department may bring suit against the person in the Circuit Court of the county where the violation occurred or is threatened, the Circuit Court in the county in which the defendant resides or in which any defendant resides if there is more than one (1) defendant, or the Franklin Circuit Court to restrain the person from continuing the violation or from carrying out the threatened violation. In the suit, the court shall have jurisdiction to grant without bond or other undertaking the prohibitory or mandatory injunction as the facts may warrant, including a temporary restraining order or injunction.

Whenever it appears that any person is violating any provision of this chapter, or any rule, administrative regulation or order promulgated or issued hereunder, the Attorney General or any person who is adversely affected by the violation may bring suit to restrain the violation in any court in which the department might have brought suit. The department shall be made a party defendant in the suit in addition to the person allegedly violating a provision or any rule, administrative regulation, or order promulgated or issued under this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 29, effective July 13, 2004.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/13/2004). When this statute was enacted (2004 Ky. Acts ch. 65, sec. 29), the word “subchapter” was erroneously included in the first sentence of subsection (2). KRS Chapter 349, which was created in this bill, is not divided into subchapters. This manifest clerical or typographical error has been corrected by changing the word “subchapter” to “chapter” by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to KRS

7.136

.

349.150.
Protection of rights in water resources — Responsibility of operators to protect and preserve water supply.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as affecting, in any way, the right of any person to enforce or protect, under applicable law, his or her interest in water resources affected by a coalbed methane well or related operations.

The operator of a coalbed methane well shall replace the water supply of an owner of an interest in real property who obtains all or part of his or her supply of water for domestic, agricultural, industrial, or other legitimate use from an underground or surface source where the supply has been affected by contamination, diminution, or interruption proximately resulting from the operation of a coalbed methane well.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 30, effective July 13, 2004.

349.155.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be subject to a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for a term not exceeding one hundred eighty (180) days, or both.

Any person who continues to violate any provision of this chapter, or any administrative regulation or order promulgated or issued under this chapter after being notified in writing of the violation by the department, shall be subject to a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for a term not exceeding one hundred eighty (180) days, or both.

Any person who does any of the following for the purpose of evading or violating this chapter or any administrative regulation or order promulgated or issued under this chapter shall be subject to a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for a term not exceeding one hundred and eighty (180) days, or both:

Makes or causes to be made a false entry or statement in a report, record, account, or memorandum, required by this chapter, or by any administrative regulation or order under this chapter;

Omits or causes to be omitted from a report, record, account, or memorandum full, true, and correct entries and information as required by this chapter, or by any administrative regulation or order under this chapter; or

Removes from this Commonwealth or destroys, mutilates, alters, or falsifies a report, record, account, or memorandum required by this chapter, or by any administrative regulation or order.

Any person who knowingly aids or abets any other person in the violation of any provision of this chapter, or any administrative regulation or order promulgated or issued under this chapter, shall be subject to the same penalty as that prescribed in this section for the violation by the other person.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 31, effective July 13, 2004.